de: Bürobedarf > Büroarbeitsmittel > Schreibwerkzeugzubehör > Marker-Nachfülltinte: Nachfülltusche für Textmarker; Nachfülltusche für Markierstifte
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기구 > 필기/제도 용구 > 마커/형광펜 잉크 리필: 하이라이터 리필; 마커 리필
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис инструменти > Аксесоари за инструменти за писане и рисуване > Пълнители с мастило за стандартни и текст маркери: Пълнители за текст маркери; Пълнители за маркери
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > เครื่องมือสำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์การเขียนและการวาด > หมึกเติมสำหรับที่ทำเครื่องหมายและที่ไฮไลต์: ไส้เติมปากกาเน้นข้อความ; ไส้เติมปากกามาร์กเกอร์
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria biurowe > Akcesoria do przyborów piśmienniczych i rysunkowych > Tusze do markerów i zakreślaczy: Wkłady do zakreślacza; Wkłady do markerów
en: Office Supplies > Office Instruments > Writing & Drawing Instrument Accessories > Marker & Highlighter Ink Refills: Highlighter Refills; Marker Refills
es: Material de oficina > Artículos de oficina > Accesorios para escritura y dibujo > Recargas para rotuladores y marcadores: Recargas de resaltadores; Recargas de marcadores
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre písacie a kresliace potreby > Náplne do popisovačov a zvýrazňovačov: Náplne do zvýrazňovačov; Náplne do popisovačov
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Instrumente de birou > Accesorii pentru instrumente de scris și desen > Rezerve de cerneală pentru marker și evidențiator: Rezerve pentru evidențiator; Rezerve pentru marker
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Instrumentos de escritório > Acessórios para instrumentos de escrita > Refis de tinta para marcadores: Refis de marca-texto; Recargas para marcadores
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用品 > 筆記具用インク・替芯 > 蛍光ペン用詰替インク: 蛍光ペンの詰め替え; マーカーの詰め替え
da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorredskaber > Skrive- og tegneredskaber – tilbehør > Fremhævningspenne og highlightere – genpåfyldningsblæk: Genopfyldninger til overstregningstuscher; Genopfyldninger til fremhævningspenne
it: Forniture per ufficio > Strumenti per ufficio > Accessori strumenti per scrivere > Ricariche d'inchiostro per evidenziatori e pennarelli: Ricariche per evidenziatori; Ricariche per pennarelli
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro instrumentai > Rašymo ir piešimo priemonių priedai > Žymeklių ir paryškinimo rašiklių rašalas papildymui: Paryškinimo rašiklių rašalas papildymui; Žymeklių rašalas papildymui
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai eszközök > Író- és rajzeszköz-kiegészítők > Jelölő- és kiemelőtinta-utántöltők: Kiemelő utántöltők; Jelölő utántöltők
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Όργανα γραφείου > Αξεσουάρ γραφικών & σχεδιαστικών οργάνων > Ανταλλακτικά μελανιών για μαρκαδόρους & υπογραμμιστές: Ανταλλακτικά υπογραμμιστών; Ανταλλακτικά μαρκαδόρων
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 事務用品 > 書寫/繪畫用具配件 > 馬克筆/螢光筆墨水填充物: 螢光筆補充墨水; 麥克筆補充墨水
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Aletleri > Yazım ve Çizim Aleti Aksesuarları > Markör ve Vurgulayıcı Mürekkep Refilleri: Fosforlu Kalem Yedekleri; Keçeli Kalem Yedekleri
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské nástroje > Psací potřeby – příslušenství > Náhradní náplně do fixů a zvýrazňovačů: Náplně do zvýrazňovačů; Náplně do popisovačů
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公文具 > 书写/绘图工具配件 > 记号笔/荧光笔补充墨水替芯: 荧光笔补充剂; 马克笔补充剂
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniški pripomočki > Dodatki za pisala in risala > Nadomestna polnila za markerje in označevalce besedila: Nadomestna polnila za označevalce besedila; Nadomestna polnila za markerje
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Material de escritório > Acessórios para instrumentos de escrita e desenho > Recargas de tinta para marcadores e sublinhadores: Recargas para sublinhador; Recargas para marcador
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Dụng cụ văn phòng > Phụ kiện dụng cũ viết và vẽ > Mực bút đánh dấu và bút dạ quang: Mực cho bút nhớ dòng; Mực cho bút viết bảng
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисные принадлежности > Аксессуары для письменных принадлежностей > Чернила для заправки маркеров и текстовыделителей: Чернила для текстовыделителей; Чернила для маркеров
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsinstrument > Tillbehör till skriv- och ritinstrument > Påfyllning till märkpennor och överstrykningspennor: Refill överstrykningspenna; Refill märkpenna
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorbenodigdheden > Accessoires voor schrijfinstrumenten > Inktpatronen voor markeerstiften en highlighters: Navullingen voor highlighters; Navullingen voor markeerstiften
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredski uređaji > Dodaci za pribor za pisanje i crtanje > Punjenje za markere i flomastere: Punjenje za flomastere; Punjenje za markere
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorinstrumenter > Tilbehør til skrive- og tegneinstrumenter > Blekkerfill til markørpenner og highlightere: Refiller til highlightere; Refiller til markørpenner
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires de bureau > Accessoires pour instruments d’écriture > Recharges d’encre pour marqueurs et surligneurs: Recharges pour surligneurs; Recharges pour marqueurs
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovälineet > Kirjoitus- ja piirustusvälineiden lisätarvikkeet > Tussien ja korostuskynien täyttömusteet: Korostuskynän täytepakkaukset; Tussin täytepakkaukset